North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-02.5 Housing Discrimination
14-02.5-45.
Intimidation or interference — Penalty.

A person commits an offense if the person, without regard to whether the person is acting under color of law, by force or threat of force, intentionally intimidates or interferes with an individual:

Because of the individual’s race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, familial status, national origin, or status with respect to marriage or public assistance and because the individual is or has been selling, purchasing, renting, financing, occupying, or contracting or negotiating for the sale, purchase, rental, financing, or occupation of any dwelling or applying for or participating in a service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings; or

Because the individual is or has been or to intimidate the individual from participating, without discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, familial status, national origin, or status with respect to marriage or public assistance, in an activity, service, organization, or facility described by subdivision a; affording another individual opportunity or protection to so participate; or lawfully aiding or encouraging other individuals to participate, without discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, familial status, national origin, or status with respect to marriage or public assistance, in an activity, service, organization, or facility described in subdivision a.

It is a discriminatory practice to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any individual in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of the individual having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of the individual having aided or encouraged any other individual in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this chapter.

An offense under subsection 1 of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 134, § 3; 2001, ch. 145, § 13.

14-02.5-46.
Records exempt.

A complaint filed with the department under section 14-02.5-18 is an open record. Information obtained during an investigation conducted by the department under this chapter is exempt from section 44-04-18 before the institution of any judicial proceedings or administrative hearing relating to the complaint under this chapter or before the administrative closure of a complaint by the department. The department may disclose to the complainant or the respondent, or representatives of the complainant or respondent, information obtained during an investigation if deemed necessary by the department for securing an appropriate resolution of a complaint. The department may disclose information obtained during an investigation to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency. Individually identifiable health information obtained during an investigation may not be disclosed by the department except to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency. Statements made or actions taken during conciliation efforts relating to a complaint under this chapter may not be disclosed by the department, except to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency, and may not be used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding under this chapter without the written consent of the parties to the conciliation. A conciliation agreement is an open record unless the complainant and respondent agree that it is not and the department determines that disclosure is not necessary to further the purposes of this chapter. Investigative working papers are exempt from section 44-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 147, § 13; 2003, ch. 120, § 3.